Massachusetts, session 194th, H1489.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  The executive office of housing and livable communities shall develop a 
savings program to assist rental tenants in the purchase of a home to be called tenant’s escrow 
accounts. The tenant’s escrow accounts shall allow for the voluntary contribution of a portion of 
a tenant’s rent to be contributed to the account. Said contribution may only be withdrawn by a 
tenant for use towards the down-payment on the purchase of a home.  
SECTION 2 Funds contributed by landlords pursuant to section 1 shall be matched by the 
commonwealth. 
SECTION 3. A landlord contributing to a tenant’s escrow account may deduct an amount 
equal to three times the amount of the contribution from the net amount of the annual taxable 
income payable by the landlord to the commonwealth. 
SECTION 4. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a 
separate fund to be known as the Tenant’s Escrow Fund. Notwithstanding any general or special 

of 2 13 law to the contrary, contributions from landlords to tenant’s escrow accounts and matching 
contributions from the commonwealth shall be credited to the fund. The Fund shall not be 
subject to section 5C of chapter 29 of the General Laws. 
SECTION 5. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate 
regulations in accordance with this act, shall provide for the option for contributions to be 
restricted by a landlord for the sole use of his tenant or, for a general contribution to be made 
available to tenants who meet certain eligibility requirements as determined by the executive 
office; provided that the secretary shall submit any proposed regulations to the joint committee 
on housing and the house and senate committees on ways and means at least 30 days before their 
adoption by the department.